Wisconsin, session 2025, SB995.
do enact as follows:SB995,13Section 1. 20.835 (2) (cd) of the statutes is created to read:SB995,1,6420.835 (2) (cd) Individual income tax rebate for 2026. A sum sufficient to 5make the payments under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (Senate Bill .... (LRB-6362/1)), 6section 1 (1).SB995,27Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB995,2,11(1) Reconciliation provision.SB995,2,32(a) If 2025 Senate Bill .... (LRB-6362/1) is enacted into law, then this act takes 3effect on the effective date of this paragraph.SB995,2,54(b) If 2025 Senate Bill .... (LRB-6362/1) is not enacted into law, then this act is 5void.SB995,2,66